Washington statutes.
RCW 26.09.560

Priority for hearing.

A hearing involving relocations or intended relocations of children shall be accorded priority on the court's motion calendar and trial docket.

[ 2000 c 21 s 18.]

NOTES:

Intent—Captions not law—2000 c 21: See notes following RCW 26.09.405.